Wyoming, session 2026, SF0047.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:
Section 1. W.S. 21-16-1304(a)(i)(A), (ii)(A) and
(iii)(A), 21-16-1305(a)(i)(A) and 21-16-1306(a)(i)(B)(II)
and (C) are amended to read:
21-16-1304. Hathaway opportunity, performance and
honor scholarships.
(a) Any student who meets the criteria under W.S.
21-16-1303 is eligible to receive a scholarship to pursue a
degree or certificate as follows:
(i) With a minimum cumulative high school GPA of
2.50 and a score equal to or greater than the 2015-2016
national percentile rank of forty-three (43) on a college
entrance examination administered throughout the United
States and relied upon by institutions of higher education
to determine acceptance of students for attendance, a
Hathaway opportunity scholarship for:
(A) Eight hundred forty dollars ($840.00)
One thousand one hundred eighty dollars ($1,180.00) per
semester at an eligible institution if enrolled for twelve
(12) or more semester hours;
(ii) With a minimum cumulative high school GPA
of 3.0 and a score equal to or greater than the 2015-2016
national percentile rank of fifty-six (56) on a college
entrance examination administered throughout the United
States and relied upon by institutions of higher education
1

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0047
ENROLLED ACT NO. 4, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
to determine acceptance of students for attendance, a
Hathaway performance scholarship for:
(A) One thousand two hundred sixty dollars
($1,260.00) One thousand seven hundred seventy dollars
($1,770.00) per semester at an eligible institution if
enrolled for twelve (12) or more semester hours;
(iii) With a minimum cumulative high school GPA
of 3.5 and a score equal to or greater than the 2015-2016
national percentile rank of seventy-nine (79) on an
examination administered throughout the United States and
relied upon by institutions of higher education to
determine acceptance of students for attendance, a Hathaway
honor scholarship for:
(A) One thousand six hundred eighty dollars
($1,680.00) Two thousand three hundred sixty dollars
($2,360.00) per semester at an eligible institution if
enrolled for twelve (12) or more semester hours;
21-16-1305. Hathaway provisional opportunity
scholarships.
(a) Any student who meets the criteria under W.S.
21-16-1303 is eligible to receive a Hathaway provisional
opportunity scholarship to pursue a certificate or degree
as follows:
(i) With a minimum cumulative high school GPA of
2.50 and either a score equal to or greater than the
2015-2016 national percentile rank of thirty (30) on a
college entrance examination administered throughout the
United States and relied upon by institutions of higher
education to determine acceptance of students for
2

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0047
ENROLLED ACT NO. 4, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
attendance or a qualifying cumulative score on a
career-technical aptitude test as determined by the
department, a scholarship for:
(A) Eight hundred forty dollars ($840.00)
One thousand one hundred eighty dollars ($1,180.00) per
semester at a Wyoming community college if enrolled for
twelve (12) or more semester hours;
21-16-1306. Need based scholarships.
(a) In addition to scholarships made available under
W.S. 21-16-1304 and 21-16-1305 there shall be made
available a need based Hathaway scholarship as follows:
(i) The scholarship shall be available only to
students qualifying for a scholarship under W.S. 21-16-1304
or 21-16-1305 and for federal financial aid. The
scholarships under this section shall be computed and
awarded as follows:
(B) If the student has annual unmet
financial need greater than two thousand dollars
($2,000.00):
(II) If a student is eligible for a
scholarship under this article but does not qualify under
subdivision (I) of this subparagraph – an award equal to
twenty-five percent (25%) of the annual unmet financial
need in excess of two thousand dollars ($2,000.00), but not
to exceed one thousand five hundred seventy-five dollars
($1,575.00) two thousand one hundred twenty dollars
($2,120.00) per year.
3

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0047
ENROLLED ACT NO. 4, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
(C) A student qualifying for any award
under this section shall receive a minimum amount of one
hundred five dollars ($105.00) one hundred fifty dollars
($150.00) for each semester of qualification. One-half
(1/2) of the annual award amount under this section shall
be provided to the student at each semester of
qualification;
Section 2. This act is effective July 1, 2026.
(END)
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
Governor
TIME APPROVED: _________
DATE APPROVED: _________
I hereby certify that this act originated in the Senate.
Chief Clerk
4